District of Columbia statutes.
4-1345.01

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5202, 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368, § 4(c), 56 DCR 1338
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 10, 59 DCR 5567
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9028, 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 2-1594.
D.C. Law 17-368, in par. (2)(D), substituted “§ 16-1001(7)” for “§ 16-1031”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 added (1)(D-i); and repealed (1)(F), which formerly read: “Mental retardation, as that term is defined in § 21-1201(7).”
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9028 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9028 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9028 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Short title: Section 5201 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle N of title V of the act may be cited as the “Integrated Funding and Services for At-Risk Children, Youth, and Families Act of 2006”.
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.